Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Penalties

405.990.
Penalties. [Repealed.]

405.991.
Penalties.

Any person or corporation violating the provisions of KRS

405.465

or

405.467

shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or be imprisoned in the county jail for not more than one (1) year, or both.

A person who violates KRS 405.490(2) shall pay the cabinet the value of the property ordered to be held or the delinquent child support, whichever is lesser, plus interest thereon at the legal rate for judgments, court costs, and reasonable attorney’s fees.

A person who violates KRS 405.430(12) shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and, in addition to any other penalties provided by law, shall be responsible for payment of any difference between the amount of child support calculated using the correct information and the prior calculation using the false information.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 144, § 16, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 487, § 18, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 330, § 16, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 365, § 11, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 255, § 51, effective July 15, 1998.